District of Columbia statutes.
48-844.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Pharmaceutical product” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 3-1201.02(10A)(B)(iii).

(2)

“Practice of pharmaceutical detailing” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 3-1201.02(10A) [§ 3-1201.02(10A)(A)].

History

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 502, 55 DCR 1659